Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 7. LOCAL AND SPECIAL LAWS

CHAPTER 143. COLLIN COUNTY

SUBCHAPTER C. LAKE LAVON

Sec. 143.023. DISCHARGE OF FIREARM. (a) Except as provided in Subsections (b) and (c) of this section, no person may shoot, fire, or discharge any firearm in, on, along, or across Lake Lavon in Collin County.

(b) This section does not apply to peace officers, game wardens, or other representatives of the department in the lawful discharge of their duties.

(c) This section does not apply to a person hunting with a shotgun during an open season or when it is lawful to hunt in or on Lake Lavon.

(d) Repealed by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 4, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 4, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.